Utah statutes.
53A-3-601.   Legislative findings.
The Legislature recognizes broad-based support from the general public and the
state's education community for school and school district performance
reports.  The Legislature further recognizes that a number of school districts
are already committed to a reporting program that gives parents individual
student achievement test information, that provides school test data results
to the school's community, and that publishes district-wide test results for
distribution to the general public.
